Utah statutes.
11-49-603.   Meeting of the Commission to review a complaint -- Procedures.

By no later than 10 calendar days after the day on which a complaint is accepted under Section 11-49-602 for further review, the commission chair shall:

(1)  schedule a commission meeting on a date no later than 45 calendar days after the date on which the commission votes to forward a complaint for final determination in accordance with Section 11-49-602;

(2)  place the complaint on the agenda for consideration at the meeting described in Subsection (1);

(3)  provide notice of the date, time, and location of the meeting:

(a)  to:

(i)  the members of the commission;

(ii)  the first complainant named in the complaint; and

(iii)  the respondent; and

(b)  in accordance with Section 52-4-202; and

(4)  provide a copy of the complaint or redacted complaint, as required in Section 11-49-602, to each member of the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

